Maine, session 132, LD1584.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Municipal cost components for services rendered. In accordance with
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, chapter 115, the Legislature determines that the net
municipal cost component for services and reimbursements to be rendered in fiscal year
2025-26 is as follows:
Fiscal Administration - Office of the State Auditor $286,996
Education $16,289,568
Forest Fire Protection $120,000
Human Services - General Assistance $55,000
Property Tax Assessment $1,389,510
Maine Land Use Planning Commission $799,806
_______________
TOTAL STATE AGENCIES $18,940,880
Page 1 - 132LR2496(03)

County Reimbursements for Services
Aroostook $2,480,883
Franklin $3,029,129
Hancock $183,366
Kennebec $20,719
Lincoln $38,570
Oxford $2,475,650
Penobscot $1,938,696
Piscataquis $2,112,825
Somerset $2,862,163
Washington $1,589,670
_______________
TOTAL COUNTY SERVICES $16,731,671
COUNTY TAX INCREMENT FINANCING DISTRIBUTIONS FROM FUND
Tax Increment Financing Payments $3,127,586
_______________
TOTAL REQUIREMENTS $38,800,137
COMPUTATION OF ASSESSMENT
Requirements $38,800,137
Less Revenue Deductions:
General Revenue
Municipal Revenue Sharing $580,000
Homestead Reimbursement $325,000
Miscellaneous Revenue $10,000
Use of Unassigned Fund Balance $3,550,317
_______________
TOTAL GENERAL REVENUE DEDUCTIONS $4,465,317
Education Revenue
Land Reserved Trust Interest $110,000
Tuition and School Transportation Charges $150,000
Special - Teacher Retirement Funding from State $250,000
_______________
TOTAL EDUCATION REVENUE DEDUCTIONS $510,000
_______________
TOTAL REVENUE DEDUCTIONS $4,975,317
_______________
TAX ASSESSMENT BEFORE COUNTY TAXES $33,824,820
AND OVERLAY (Title 36, §1602)
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2496(03)